Washington statutes.
RCW 11.84.060

Reversion and vested remainder.

Property in which the slayer holds a reversion or vested remainder and would have obtained the right of present possession upon the death of the decedent shall pass to the estate of the decedent during the period of the life expectancy of decedent; if he or she held the particular estate or if the particular estate is held by a third person it shall remain in his or her hands for such period.

[ 2010 c 8 s 2086; 1965 c 145 s 11.84.060. Prior: 1955 c 141 s 6.]